Utah statutes.
45-3-3.   Acts constituting abuse -- Permitting prosecution.

(1)  Except for purposes of the criminal penalty in Section 76-9-407, the personal identity of an individual is abused if:

(a)  an advertisement is published in which the personal identity of that individual is used in a manner which expresses or implies that the individual approves, endorses, has endorsed, or will endorse the specific subject matter of the advertisement; and

(b)  consent has not been obtained for such use from the individual, or if the individual is a minor, then consent of one of the minor's parents or consent of the minor's legally appointed guardian.

(2)  Nothing in this part prohibits prosecution of abuse of personal identity under Section 76-9-407.

